src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! # Skolt Saami verb morphology

!! First a lexicon V_ for still unclassified entries.

LEXICON V_
+V+Inf: # ;

LEXICON V-NEG_
+V+Neg: # ;

!! ## Irregular verbs

!! Then irregular verbs ij and the copula.

LEXICON V-NEG_IJ  !!= * @CODE@ ij:
!! The lexicon *@LEXNAME@*

+V+Neg+Ind+Sg1:jiõˈm	   K ; !!= * @CODE@
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+V+Neg+Ind+Sg1:jim	   K ; !!= * @CODE@
+V+Neg+Ind+Sg2:jiõˈk	   K ; !!= * @CODE@
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+V+Neg+Ind+Sg2:jik	   K ;
+V+Neg+Ind+Sg3:ij		   K ;
+V+Neg+Ind+Sg4:jeäˈʹt	   K ;
+V+Neg+Ind+Pl1:jeäˈʹp	   K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+V+Neg+Ind+Pl1:jeʹp	   K ;
+V+Neg+Ind+Pl2:jeäˈʹped   K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+V+Neg+Ind+Pl2:jeʹped	   K ;
+V+Neg+Ind+Pl3:jiâ	   K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+V+Neg+Ind+Pl3:jeä	   K ;
+V+Neg+Ind+Pl3:jie	   K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+V+Neg+Ind+Pl3:jee	   K ;

+V+Neg+Imprt+Sg2:jieˈʹl	   K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+V+Neg+Imprt+Sg2:jeäˈʹl	   K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+V+Neg+Imprt+Sg2:jeˈʹl	   K ;
+V+Neg+Imprt+Pl2:jieʹlˈled  K ;	
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+V+Neg+Imprt+Pl2:jeʹlˈled   K ;	
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+V+Neg+Imprt+Pl2:jeäʹled   K ;	

+V+Neg+Pot+Sg2:jieˈʹl	   K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+V+Neg+Pot+Sg2:jeˈʹl	   K ;
+V+Neg+Pot+Sg3:jeälas	   K ;
+V+Neg+Pot+Pl1:jeälˈlap   K ;
+V+Neg+Pot+Pl2:jieʹlˈled  K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+V+Neg+Pot+Pl2:jeʹlˈled   K ;			
+V+Neg+Pot+Pl3:jeälˈlaz   K ;



LEXICON V_LEEQD !!= * @CODE@ leeʹd:l
!! The lexicon *@LEXNAME@* for the copula

+Ind+Prs:		LEED-PRS ;
+Ind+Prt:		LEED-PRT ;
+Imprt:			LEED-IMPRT ;
+Imprt+Sg2:eäkˈku	K ;
+Imprt+ConNeg:%>eäkˈku K ;
:%>eʹč		CONDITIONAL ; !
+Pot+Sg1:%>eʹžžem K	;
+Pot+Sg2:%>eʹžžiǩ K	;
+Pot+Sg3:%>eežž	K ; !WG
+Pot+Sg3:%>eež	K ; !
+Pot+Pl1:%>eʹžžep K	; !
+Pot+Pl1:%>eʹžžim K	; !
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Pot+Pl1:%>eʹžžin K	; !Does this exist
+Pot+Pl2:%>eʹžžveʹted K	;
+Pot+Pl3:%>eʹžže K	;
+Pot+Sg4:%>eʹžžet K ;
+Pot+ConNeg:%>eʹžže K ;
+Inf:%>eeʹd K ;
+Act+PrsPrc:%>eʹddi K ;
+Act+PrfPrc:%>eämˈmaž K ;
+Err/Orth+Act+PrfPrc:%>eäʹmmaž K ;
+Act+PrfPrc:%>eämˈma K ;
+Act+PrfPrc:%>eäm K ;

LEXICON NEG-COPULA
iʹlla+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg3:iʹlla K ; !ei ole
iʹlla+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg3:iʹllak K ; !ei ole
iʹlla+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg3:iʹlle K ; !ei ole
iʹlla+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg3:iʹllä K ; !ei ole
iʹlla+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg3:iʹllakku K ; !ei ole
iʹlla+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg3:iʹlleäk K ; !ei ole
iʹlla+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg3:iʹlleäkˈku K ; !ei ole
iʹlla+V+Neg+Ind+Prt+Sg3:iʹlleäm K ; !ei ollut
iʹlla+V+Neg+Ind+Prt+Sg3:iʹllääm K ; !ei ollut
iʹlla+V+Neg+Ind+Prt+Sg3:iʹlleämˈma K ; !ei ollut
iʹlla+V+Neg+Ind+Prt+Sg3:iʹlleämmaž K ; !ei ollut

iʹlla+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl3:jeäʹla K ; !eivät ole
iʹlla+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl3:jiâla K ; !eivät ole
iʹlla+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl3:jielä K ; !eivät ole
iʹlla+V+Neg+Ind+Prt+Pl3:jeäʹleäm K ; !eivät olleet
iʹlla+V+Neg+Ind+Prt+Pl3:jeäʹleämma K ; !eivät olleet
iʹlla+V+Neg+Ind+Prt+Pl3:jeäʹläm K ; !eivät olleet
iʹlla+V+Neg+Ind+Prt+Pl3:jeäʹlämma K ; !eivät olleet
iʹlla+V+Neg+Ind+Prt+Pl3:jeäʹlämmaž K ; !eivät olleet

iʹlla+V+Neg+Cond+Sg3:iʹlleʹjje K ; !ei olisi
iʹlla+V+Neg+Cond+Sg3:iʹlleʹčče K ; !ei olisi
iʹlla+V+Neg+Pot+Sg3:iʹlleʹžže K ; !ei olisi


!! ## REGULAR VERBS
!! ### CLASS 1 HIGH VOWEL, NO PALATALIZATION

LEXICON V_POOLLYD !!= * @CODE@ põõllâd:põõll
: V0_POOLLYD ;
LEXICON IV_POOLLYD !!= * @CODE@ põõllâd:põõll
+IV: V0_POOLLYD ;
LEXICON TV_POOLLYD !!= * @CODE@ põõllâd:põõll
+TV: V0_POOLLYD ;
LEXICON V0_POOLLYD !!= * @CODE@ põõllâd:põõll
!!! inflection_type="1"
!!! pos="V"
!!! syll_count-in-Ind_Prs_Sg3="1"
!!! stem_vowel-in-Inf="â"
!!! gradation_type="normal"
!!! Inf="short_vowel" Imprt_Sg3="long_vowel|single_consonant"

! foot: 2syll
! 1.1 Inf in âd (vowel shift)
! diphthong: no
! vowel_shift: yes
! consonant_type: geminate-single
! gradation: yes3
! weak_grade: single
! strong_grade: geminate

!   Raised: Inf, Ind.Prt.Pl3, Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3
!   Lowered: Ind.Prs.Sg3, Ind.Prs.Pl3, Imprt.Sg3
! palatal_coloring: no (%^PALÄ, %^PALE, %^PALẸ)
! palatalization: yes (%^PAL, %^PALNo)
! velar_palatalization: FIX no (pååttaǩ)
! 1.1.1 Has Palatalization
! 1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
!   Palatalized: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Not Palatalized: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3, Imprt.Sg2, Imprt.Sg3, Pot.Sg3
! pedagogical_gradation: no
! orthographic_gradation: yes
! 1.1.1[1].1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].1.1[231] (Monophthong + Consonant and Consonant Geminate alternation)
!   Strong grade: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3  = põõllâd
!   Extra strong grade: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Weak grade: Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3, Imprt.Sg3
! FORMS
! (1)  Inf: põõllâd
! (2)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: pââll
! (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: pâʹlle
! (4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: põʹlle
! (5)  Ind.Imprt.Sg2: põõl
! (6)  Ind.Pot.Sg3: põõlâž
! (7)  Ind.Imprt.Sg3: pââlas
! (8)  Imprt.13.ConNeg: põll
! (9)  Ind.Imprt.Pl3: pâllaz
! (10) Allegro for incoative: põl
! * Yaml: __V-moonnad__
! põõllâd:põõll
! Strong grade in penultimate syllable
: VSUF-INF_YD ; !1 põõllâd
!:%^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_YD ; !2
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%^VOWLower K ; ! pââll
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VV2V%^VOWLower%^PAL%>e K ; !3 pâʹlle
:%^VV2V%^PAL VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_YD ; !4 põʹlle
:%^CC2C VSUF-I-POTKOND_YD ; !5 põõl-
+Pot+Sg3:%^CC2C%>âž   K ; !6 põõl-
+Imprt+Sg3:%^VOWLower%^CC2C%>as K ; !7 pââlas
:%^VV2V VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_YD ; !8 põll-
+Imprt+ConNegII:%^VV2V%>u K ; ! põllu
+Imprt+Pl3:%^VV2V%^VOWLower%>az K ; ! pâllaz

:%^VV2V%^CC2CAllegro FOR-ALLEGRO-DEVERBAL-DERIVATION ;

LEXICON V_LAUKKOOLLYD !!= * @CODE@ laukkõõllâd:laukkõõll
: V0_LAUKKOOLLYD ;
LEXICON IV_LAUKKOOLLYD !!= * @CODE@ laukkõõllâd:laukkõõll
+IV: V0_LAUKKOOLLYD ;
LEXICON TV_LAUKKOOLLYD !!= * @CODE@ laukkõõllâd:laukkõõll
+TV: V0_LAUKKOOLLYD ;
LEXICON V0_LAUKKOOLLYD !!= * @CODE@ laukkõõllâd:laukkõõll
!!! inflection_type="1"
! pos: V
! 1. VERBS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE Ind.Prs.Sg3 (2009: 354)
! inf: âd
! foot: 2syll
! 1.1 Inf in âd (vowel shift)
! diphthong: no
! vowel_shift: yes
! consonant_type: geminate-single
! gradation: yes3
! weak_grade: single
! strong_grade: geminate

!   Raised: Inf, Ind.Prt.Pl3, Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3
!   Lowered: Ind.Prs.Sg3, Ind.Prs.Pl3, Imprt.Sg3
! palatal_coloring: no (%^PALÄ, %^PALE, %^PALẸ)
! palatalization: yes (%^PAL, %^PALNo)
! velar_palatalization: FIX no (pååttaǩ)
! 1.1.1 Has Palatalization
! 1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
!   Palatalized: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Not Palatalized: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3, Imprt.Sg2, Imprt.Sg3, Pot.Sg3
! pedagogical_gradation: no
! orthographic_gradation: yes
! 1.1.1[1].1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].1.1[231] (Monophthong + Consonant and Consonant Geminate alternation)
!   Strong grade: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3  = laukkõõllâd
!   Extra strong grade: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Weak grade: Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3, Imprt.Sg3
! FORMS
! (1)  Inf: laukkõõllâd
! (2)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: pââll
! (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: pâʹlle
! (4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: põʹlle
! (5)  Ind.Imprt.Sg2: põõl
! (6)  Ind.Pot.Sg3: põõlâž
! (7)  Ind.Imprt.Sg3: laukkõõlas
! (8)  Imprt.ConNegII: laukkõll
! (9)  Ind.Imprt.Pl3: laukkâllaz
! (10) Allegro for incoative: laukkõl
! * Yaml: __V-moonnad__
! laukkõõllâd:laukkõõll
! Strong grade in penultimate syllable
: VSUF-INF_YD ; !!= * @CODE@1 laukkõõllâd
!:%^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_YD ; !2
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%^VOWLower K ; !!= * @CODE@ laukkââll
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VV2V%^VOWLower%^PAL%>e K ; !!= * @CODE@3 laukkâʹlle
:%^VV2V%^PAL VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_YD ; !!= * @CODE@4 laukkõʹlle
:%^CC2C VSUF-I-POTKOND_YD ; !!= * @CODE@5 laukkõõl-
+Pot+Sg3:%^CC2C%>âž   K ; !!= * @CODE@6 laukkõõl-
+Imprt+Sg3:%^CC2C%>as K ; !!= * @CODE@7 laukkõõlas
:%^VV2V VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_YD ; !!= * @CODE@8 laukkõll-
+Imprt+ConNegII:%^VV2V%>u K ; !!= * @CODE@ laukkõllu
+Imprt+Pl3:%^VV2V%^VOWLower%>az K ; !!= * @CODE@ laukkâllaz
:%^VV2V%^CC2CAllegro FOR-ALLEGRO-DEVERBAL-DERIVATION ;


LEXICON V_VIIKKYD !!= * @CODE@ viikkâd:viikk
: V0_VIIKKYD ;
LEXICON IV_VIIKKYD !!= * @CODE@ viikkâd:viikk
+IV: V0_VIIKKYD ;
LEXICON TV_VIIKKYD !!= * @CODE@ viikkâd:viikk
+TV: V0_VIIKKYD ;
LEXICON V0_VIIKKYD !!= * @CODE@ viikkâd:viikk
!!! inflection_type="1"
! pos: V
! gradation: yes
! weak geminate
! 1. VERBS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE Ind.Prs.Sg3 (2009: 354)
! foot: 2syll
! inf: âd
! 1.1 Inf in âd (vowel shift)
! vowel_shift: yes
! diphthong: no
! consonant_type: single::geminate
!   Raised: Inf, Ind.Prt.Pl3, Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3
!   Lowered: Ind.Prs.Sg3, Ind.Prs.Pl3, Imprt.Sg3
! palatal_coloring: no (%^PALÄ, %^PALE, %^PALẸ)
! palatalization: yes (%^PAL, %^PALNo)
! velar_palatalization: FIX no (pååttaǩ)
! 1.1.1 Has Palatalization
! 1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
!   Palatalized: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Not Palatalized: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3, Imprt.Sg2, Imprt.Sg3, Pot.Sg3
! pedagogical_gradation: no
! orthographic_gradation: yes
! 1.1.1[1].1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].1.1[231] (Monophthong + Consonant and Consonant Geminate alternation)
!   Strong grade: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3  = viikkâd
!   Extra strong grade: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Weak grade: Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3, Imprt.Sg3
! FORMS
! * Yaml: __V-viikkad__
! viikkâd:viikk
! Strong grade in penultimate syllable
: VSUF-INF_YD ; !!= * @CODE@ (1)  Inf: viikkâd
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2,
!! Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc
!!  Ind.Prt.ConNeg, Imprt+Pl3, PrfPrc
!! NomAct in MOsh
!!€ põõss%>âd
!!€ põõss%>âd

:%^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_YD ; !!= * @CODE@ (2)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: veekk
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3
!!€ põõss%^VOWLower
!!€ pââss0

+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VV2V%^VOWLower%^PAL%>e K ; !!= * @CODE@ (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: veʹǩǩe
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3
!!€ põõ0ss%^VV2V%^VOWLower%^PAL%>e
!!€ pâ0ʹss000%>e

:%^VV2V%^PAL VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_YD ; !!= * @CODE@ (4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: viʹǩǩe
!! +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4
!!€ põõ0ss%^VV2V%^PAL%>e
!!€ põ0ʼss00%>e

:%^KK2GG VSUF-I-POTKOND_YD ; !!= * @CODE@ (5-6)  Pot.Sg3: viiǥǥâž
!! +Ind+Prs+Sg1, +Ind+Prs+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+Sg4
!! Imprt+Sg2, Imprt+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr
!! Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot, Cond, +Der+Der/Caus
!!€ põõss%^KK2GG%>âž
!!€ põõzz0%>âž

+Imprt+Sg3:%^VOWLower%^KK2GG%>as K ; !!= * @CODE@ (7)  Imprt.Sg3: veeǥǥas
!! Imprt+Sg3
!!€ põõss%^VOWLower%^KK2GG%>as
!!€ pââzz00%>as

:%^VV2V VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_YD ; !!= * @CODE@ (8)  Imprt.ConNegII: vikku
!! Imprt+ConNegII, Pass+PrfPrc
!!€ põõss%^VV2V%>u
!!€ põ0ss0%>u

+Imprt+Pl3:%^VV2V%^VOWLower%>az K ; !!= * @CODE@ (9) Ind.Imprt.Pl3: vekkaz
!! Imprt+Pl3
!!€ põõss%^VV2V%^VOWLower%>az
!!€ pâ0ss00%>az

!!= * @CODE@ (10) Allegro for incoative: viǥ», põz»
:%^VV2V%^KK2GAllegro FOR-ALLEGRO-DEVERBAL-DERIVATION ;
!!€ põõss%^VV2V%^KK2GAllegro»škuätt
!!€ põ0z000»škuätt

LEXICON V_PIYKKLOOCHCHYD !!= * @CODE@ piâkklõõččâd:piâkklõõčč
: V0_PIYKKLOOCHCHYD ;
LEXICON IV_PIYKKLOOCHCHYD !!= * @CODE@ piâkklõõččâd:piâkklõõčč
+IV: V0_PIYKKLOOCHCHYD ;
